Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-308
Signer of document; requirements.

An electronic notarial act shall not be performed if the signer of the electronic document is not in the physical presence of the electronic notary public at the time of notarization and is not personally known to the electronic notary public or identified by the notary public through satisfactory evidence as provided in section 64-105.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 8.